Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.50.010

Registration of lobbyists. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) Before lobbying, or within 30 days after being employed as a lobbyist, whichever occurs first, unless exempt under RCW 29B.50.040, a lobbyist shall register by filing with the commission a lobbyist registration statement, in such detail as the commission shall prescribe, that includes the following information:

(a) The lobbyist's name, permanent business address, electronic contact information, and any temporary residential and business addresses in Thurston county during the legislative session;

(b) The name, address and occupation or business of the lobbyist's employer;

(c) The duration of the lobbyist's employment;

(d) The compensation to be received for lobbying, the amount to be paid for expenses, and what expenses are to be reimbursed;

(e) Whether the lobbyist is employed solely as a lobbyist or whether the lobbyist is a regular employee performing services for the lobbyist's employer which include but are not limited to the influencing of legislation;

(f) The general subject or subjects to be lobbied;

(g) A written authorization from each of the lobbyist's employers confirming such employment;

(h) The name, address, and electronic contact information of the person who will have custody of the accounts, bills, receipts, books, papers, and documents required to be kept under this title;

(i) If the lobbyist's employer is an entity (including, but not limited to, business and trade associations) whose members include, or which as a representative entity undertakes lobbying activities for, businesses, groups, associations, or organizations, the name and address of each member of such entity or person represented by such entity whose fees, dues, payments, or other consideration paid to such entity during either of the prior two years have exceeded *five hundred dollars or who is obligated to or has agreed to pay fees, dues, payments, or other consideration exceeding *five hundred dollars to such entity during the current year;

(j) An attestation that the lobbyist has read and completed a training course provided under RCW 44.04.390 regarding the legislative code of conduct and any policies related to appropriate conduct adopted by the senate or the house of representatives.

(2) Any lobbyist who receives or is to receive compensation from more than one person for lobbying shall file a separate notice of representation for each person. However, if two or more persons are jointly paying or contributing to the payment of the lobbyist, the lobbyist may file a single statement detailing the name, business address, and occupation of each person paying or contributing and the respective amounts to be paid or contributed.

(3) Whenever a change, modification, or termination of the lobbyist's employment occurs, the lobbyist shall file with the commission an amended registration statement within one week of the change, modification, or termination.

(4) Each registered lobbyist shall file a new registration statement, revised as appropriate, on the second Monday in January of each odd-numbered year. Failure to do so terminates the lobbyist's registration.

[ 2024 c 164 s 473. Prior: 2019 c 469 s 2; 2019 c 428 s 29; 2010 c 204 s 801; 1987 c 201 s 1; 1982 c 147 s 10; 1973 c 1 s 15 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.600, 42.17.150.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The dollar amounts in this section may have been adjusted for inflation by rule of the commission adopted under the authority of RCW 29B.20.050. For current dollar amounts, see WAC 390-20-150.

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2019 c 469 ss 2 and 3: "Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect December 31, 2019." [ 2019 c 469 s 5.]

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.